Utah statutes.
39-1-44.   Members of military courts exempt from liability.

No action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or maintained against a member of a military court or officer, or person acting under its authority or reviewing its proceedings, on account of the imposition, approval or execution of any sentence, or the imposition or collection of a fine or penalty, or the execution of any warrant, writ, execution, process or mandate of a military court.

